Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-197
Counties; boundary changes; election; notice.

Notices of such election shall contain a map of the existing and the proposed boundary with statement of the territory to be transferred and the reasons for such proposed change and shall be posted with the other notices of the general election.

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 13, p. 829;

C.S.1922, § 815;

C.S.1929, § 25-1,102;

R.S.1943, § 22-197.

For notice of election, see section 32-802.